Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Definitions

271B.1-400.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter:

“Appropriate court” means the Circuit Court for the county within the Commonwealth in which the corporation maintains its principal office or, if none, the county in which the registered office is located;

“Articles of incorporation” include amended and restated articles of incorporation and articles of merger;

“Authorized shares” means the shares of all classes a domestic or foreign corporation is authorized to issue;

“Conspicuous” means so written that a reasonable person against whom the writing is to operate should have noticed it. For example, printing in italics or boldface or contrasting color, or typing in capitals or underlining, shall be considered conspicuous;

“Corporation” or “domestic corporation” means a corporation for profit, which is not a foreign corporation, incorporated under or subject to the provisions of this chapter, and includes a professional service corporation and a public benefit corporation;

“Deliver” or “delivery” means any method of delivery used in conventional commercial practice, including delivery by hand, mail, commercial delivery, and electronic transmission;

“Distribution” means a direct or indirect transfer of money or other property (except its own shares) or incurrence of indebtedness by a corporation to or for the benefit of its shareholders in respect of any of its shares. A distribution may be in the form of a declaration or payment of a dividend; a purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of shares; a distribution of indebtedness; or otherwise;

“Effective date of notice” is defined in KRS

271B.1-410

;

“Electronic transmission” or “electronically transmitted” means any process of communication not directly involving the physical transfer of paper that is suitable for the retention, retrieval, and reproduction of information by the recipient;

“Employee” includes an officer but not a director. A director may accept duties that make him also an employee;

“Entity” includes a domestic or foreign corporation; not-for-profit corporation; profit and not-for-profit unincorporated association; business trust, estate, partnership, trust, and two (2) or more persons having a joint or common economic interest; and state, United States, and foreign government;

“Foreign corporation” means a corporation for profit incorporated under a law other than the law of this state;

“Governmental subdivision” includes authority, county, district, and municipality;

“Includes” denotes a partial definition;

“Individual” means a natural person and includes the estate of an incompetent or deceased individual;

“Means” denotes an exhaustive definition;

“Name of record with the Secretary of State” means any real, fictitious, reserved, registered, or assumed name of an entity;

“Notice” is defined in KRS

271B.1-410

;

“Person” includes individual and entity;

“Principal office” means the office in or out of this state, so designated in writing to the Secretary of State where the principal executive offices of a domestic or foreign corporation are located;

“Proceeding” includes civil suit and criminal, administrative, and investigatory action;

“Public benefit” means a positive effect or reduction of negative effects on one (1) or more categories of persons, entities, communities, or interests other than stockholders in their capacities as stockholders;

“Public benefit corporation” means a for-profit corporation that is intended to produce a public benefit and to operate in a responsible manner, balancing the stockholders’ pecuniary interests, the best interests of those materially affected by the corporation’s conduct, and the public benefit identified in its articles of incorporation;

“Public benefit provisions” means the provisions of articles of incorporation authorized by KRS

271B.2-020

(4);

“Real name” shall have the meaning set forth in KRS

365.015

;

“Record date” means the date established under Subtitle 6 or 7 of this chapter on which a corporation determines the identity of its shareholders and their shareholdings for purposes of this chapter. The determinations shall be made as of the close of business on the record date, unless another time for doing so is specified when the record date is fixed;

“Secretary” means the corporate officer to whom the board of directors has delegated responsibility under KRS

271B.8-400

(3) for custody of the minutes of the meetings of the board of directors and of the shareholders and for authenticating records of the corporation;

“Share” means the unit into which the proprietary interests in a corporation are divided;

“Shareholder” means the person in whose name shares are registered in the records of a corporation or the beneficial owner of shares to the extent of the rights granted by a nominee certificate on file with a corporation;

“Sign” or “signature” includes any manual, facsimile, or conformed or electronic signature;

“State,” when referring to a part of the United States, includes a state and Commonwealth and their agencies and governmental subdivisions, and a territory and insular possession and their agencies and governmental subdivisions of the United States;

“Subscriber” means a person who subscribes for shares in a corporation, whether before or after incorporation;

“United States” includes district, authority, bureau, commission, department, and any other agency of the United States; and

“Voting group” means all shares of one (1) or more classes or series that under the articles of incorporation or this chapter are entitled to vote and be counted together collectively on a matter at a meeting of shareholders. All shares entitled by the articles of incorporation or this chapter to vote generally on the matter are for that purpose a single voting group.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 12, effective January 1, 1989; 1998, ch. 341, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 102, § 6, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 137, § 51, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
51, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 34, § 6, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 28, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137, sec. 51, subsection (21) cited “Section 164 of this Act.” It is apparent from context that the section referred to should have been Section 163 of the Act, KRS

365.015

. The Reviser of Statutes has made this change under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

271B.1-410.
Written or oral notice — How given — When effective.

Notice under this chapter shall be in writing unless oral notice is reasonable under the circumstances. Notice by electronic transmission is written notice.

Notice may be communicated in person; by mail or other method of delivery; or by telephone, voice mail, or other electronic means. If these forms of personal notice are impracticable, notice may be communicated by a newspaper of general circulation in the area where published; or by radio, television, or other form of public broadcast communication.

Written notice by a domestic or foreign corporation to its shareholder, if in a comprehensible form, shall be effective:

Upon deposit in the United States mail, if mailed postpaid and correctly addressed to the shareholder’s address shown in the corporation’s current record of shareholders; or

When electronically transmitted to the shareholder in a manner authorized and in accordance with the shareholder’s instructions, if any.

Written notice to a domestic or foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state may be addressed to its registered agent at its registered office or to the corporation or its secretary at its principal office address of record with the Secretary of State.

Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, written notice, if in a comprehensible form, shall be effective at the earliest of the following:

When received;

Five (5) days after its deposit in the United States mail, if mailed postpaid and correctly addressed; or

On the date shown on the return receipt, if sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the receipt is signed by or on behalf of the addressee.

Oral notice shall be effective when communicated, if communicated in a comprehensible manner.

If this chapter prescribes notice requirements for particular circumstances, those requirements, shall govern. If articles of incorporation or bylaws prescribe notice requirements not inconsistent with this section or other provisions of this chapter, those requirements shall govern.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 13, effective January 1, 1989; 2002, ch. 102, § 7, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 137, § 52, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
52, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 106, § 5, effective June 25, 2013.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

271B.1-420.
Number of shareholders.

For purposes of this chapter, the following identified as a shareholder in a corporation’s current record of shareholders shall constitute one (1) shareholder:

Three (3) or fewer co-owners;

A corporation, partnership, trust, estate, or other entity;

The trustees, guardians, custodians, or other fiduciaries of a single trust, estate, or account.

For purposes of this chapter, shareholdings registered in substantially similar names shall constitute one (1) shareholder if it is reasonable to believe that the names represent the same person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 14, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.1-430.
Independent legal significance.

Action validly taken pursuant to one (1) provision of this chapter shall not be deemed invalid solely because it is identical or similar in substance to an action that could have been taken pursuant to some other provision of this chapter but fails to satisfy one (1) or more requirements prescribed by such other provision.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 133, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.